Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-262
County agricultural society; right of eminent domain; procedure.

Each county agricultural society may acquire, take, hold, and appropriate so much real estate as may be necessary for the purpose of holding county fairs. No appropriation of private property for the use of such society shall be made until full and just compensation therefor be first made to the owner thereof, and not more than forty acres shall be taken without the consent of the owner. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1879, § 13, p. 400;

R.S.1913, § 9;

Laws 1915, c. 9, § 1, p. 57;

C.S.1922, § 9;

C.S.1929, § 2-204;

R.S.1943, § 2-207;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 25, p. 458;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 2-207;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 13.

Section quoted in tracing history of act. Owen v. Main, 92 Neb. 258, 138 N.W. 154 (1912).